Utah statutes.
63G-3-202.   Rules having the effect of law.

(1)  An agency's written statement is a rule if it conforms to the definition of a rule under Section 63G-3-102, but the written statement is not enforceable unless it is made as a rule in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)  An agency's written statement that is made as a rule in accordance with the requirements of this chapter is enforceable and has the effect of law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

